Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 2411.
Applicability of other law.

Except as specifically provided in this chapter, all other provisions of this title shall govern the several procedures specified in this chapter for the making of nominations.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2412.
Withdrawal of candidacy.

A candidate who has been validly nominated by one of the methods prescribed in this chapter shall have a right to withdraw his or her candidacy up until 5:00 p.m. on the tenth day following the primary by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the town clerk in the case of a candidate for justice of the peace, and with the Secretary of State in the case of all other offices.
(a) (1) A candidate who has been validly nominated by one of the methods prescribed in this chapter shall have a right to withdraw his or her candidacy up until 5:00 p.m. on the tenth day following the primary by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the town clerk in the case of a candidate for justice of the peace, and with the Secretary of State in the case of all other offices.

The name of a candidate who has withdrawn in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall not be printed on the ballot.

After the date described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if the candidate has filed a written notice of withdrawal, the town clerk or Secretary of State may still remove the candidate’s name from the ballot up until the printing deadline.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 35;

2003, No. 59

, § 14;

2017, No. 50

, § 19.

§ 2413.
Nomination of justices of the peace.

The party members in each town, on or before each primary election, upon the call of the town committee, may meet in caucus and nominate candidates for justice of the peace.
(a) (1) The party members in each town, on or before each primary election, upon the call of the town committee, may meet in caucus and nominate candidates for justice of the peace.

The committee shall give notice of the caucus by posting notice at the office of the town clerk and two other public places in the town at least five days prior to the caucus.
(2) (A) The committee shall give notice of the caucus by posting notice at the office of the town clerk and two other public places in the town at least five days prior to the caucus.

In addition, for towns with over 3,000 voters, the committee shall post this notice at least one day prior to the caucus:

in a newspaper of general circulation within the town; or

(II)

on a nonpartisan electronic news media website that specializes in news of the State or the community; and

on the municipality’s website, if the municipality actively updates its website on a regular basis.

[Repealed.]

If it does not hold a caucus as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the town committee shall meet and nominate candidates for justices of the peace as provided in sections 2381 through 2385 of this title. At least three days prior to this meeting, the town committee shall provide notice of the meeting by e-mailing or mailing committee members and by posting notice of the meeting in the office of the town clerk and in two other public places in the town.

In any town in which a political party has not formally organized, any three members of the party who are voters in the town may call a caucus to nominate candidates for justice of the peace by giving notice as required in subsection (a) of this section. Upon meeting, the caucus shall first elect a chair and a secretary. Thereafter the caucus shall nominate its candidates for justice of the peace.

[Repealed.]

For any nomination made under this section, the chair and secretary of the committee or caucus shall file the statement required by section 2385 of this title by 5:00 p.m. on the third day following the primary election.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 36; amended

2009, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 7, 2010;

2009, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2010;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 28, 2014;

2015, No. 30

, § 8, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2414.
Candidates for State and legislative office; disclosure form.

Each candidate for State office, State Senator, or State Representative shall file with the officer with whom consent of candidate forms are filed, along with his or her consent, a disclosure form prepared by the State Ethics Commission that contains the following information in regard to the previous calendar year:

Each source, but not amount, of personal income of the candidate and of his or her spouse or domestic partner, and of the candidate together with his or her spouse or domestic partner, that totals more than $5,000.00, including any of the sources meeting that total described as follows:

employment, including the employer or business name and address and, if self-employed, a description of the nature of the self-employment without needing to disclose any individual clients; and

investments, described generally as “investment income.”

Any board, commission, or other entity that is regulated by law or that receives funding from the State on which the candidate served and the candidate’s position on that entity.

Any company of which the candidate or his or her spouse or domestic partner, or the candidate together with his or her spouse or domestic partner, owned more than 10 percent.

Any lease or contract with the State held or entered into by:

the candidate or his or her spouse or domestic partner; or

a company of which the candidate or his or her spouse or domestic partner, or the candidate together with his or her spouse or domestic partner, owned more than 10 percent.

In addition, if a candidate’s spouse or domestic partner is a lobbyist, the candidate shall disclose that fact and provide the name of his or her spouse or domestic partner and, if applicable, the name of his or her lobbying firm.

In addition, each candidate for State office shall attach to the disclosure form described in subsection (a) of this section a copy of his or her most recent U.S. Individual Income Tax Return Form 1040; provided, however, that the candidate may redact from that form the following information:

the candidate’s Social Security number and that of his or her spouse, if applicable;

the names of any dependent and the dependent’s Social Security number; and

the signature of the candidate and that of his or her spouse, if applicable.

A senatorial district clerk or representative district clerk who receives a disclosure form under this section shall forward a copy of the disclosure to the Secretary of State within three business days of receiving it.
(d) (1) A senatorial district clerk or representative district clerk who receives a disclosure form under this section shall forward a copy of the disclosure to the Secretary of State within three business days of receiving it.

The Secretary of State shall post a copy of any disclosure forms and tax returns he or she receives under this section on his or her official State website. The forms shall remain posted on the Secretary’s website until the date of the filing deadline for petition and consent forms for major party candidates for the statewide primary in the following election cycle.
(2) (A) The Secretary of State shall post a copy of any disclosure forms and tax returns he or she receives under this section on his or her official State website. The forms shall remain posted on the Secretary’s website until the date of the filing deadline for petition and consent forms for major party candidates for the statewide primary in the following election cycle.

Prior to posting, the Secretary shall redact from a tax return the information permitted to be redacted under subsection (c) of this section, if the candidate fails to do so.

As used in this section:

“Domestic partner” means an individual with whom the candidate has an enduring domestic relationship of a spousal nature, as long as the candidate and the domestic partner:

have shared a residence for at least six consecutive months;

are at least 18 years of age;

are not married to or considered a domestic partner of another individual;

are not related by blood closer than would bar marriage under State law; and

have agreed between themselves to be responsible for each other’s welfare.

“Lobbyist” and “lobbying firm” shall have the same meanings as in

2 V.S.A. § 261

.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 79

, § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2018; amended

2019, No. 67

, § 10.